North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 36. Truthful Advertisements of Costs of Servicing or Repairing Private Passenger Vehicles.

§ 66-285.
Advertisements of servicing or repairing private passenger vehicles.

Any business that services or repairs private passenger vehicles and advertises the cost of a specified service or repair of private passenger vehicles shall disclose in the advertisement all additional charges routinely charged for that service or repair, including shop supplies or charges, except any fees and taxes that are required by law, that a consumer will be charged.

If a business that services or repairs private passenger vehicles fails to comply with the requirements of this section, then, upon written notice to that business, the consumer is required to pay only those charges disclosed in the advertisement, plus any fees and taxes that are required by law.

A violation of this section shall constitute an unfair trade practice under

G.S. 75-1.1

.

For purposes of this section, “private passenger vehicle” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 20-4.01

.

History.

1999-437, s. 2.

§§ 66-286 through 66-289.

Reserved for future codification purposes.